Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.065

Election to use out-of-state service credit to calculate time at which the member may retire.

A member who has not purchased service credit under the provisions of RCW 41.32.813 or 41.32.868 may elect under this section to apply service credit earned in an out-of-state retirement system that covers teachers in public schools solely for the purpose of determining the time at which the member may retire. The benefit shall be actuarially reduced to recognize the difference between the age a member would have first been able to retire based on service in the state of Washington and the member's retirement age.

[ 2006 c 257 s 3; 1991 c 278 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 257: See note following RCW 41.32.813.